Illinois, session 104th, HB4759.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Green 5Light for Buses Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Authority" means the Northern Illinois Transit Authority. 8    "Committee" means the Committee on Efficient Arterial 9Signal Infrastructure established under this Act. 10    "Department" means the Department of Transportation. 11    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Transportation. 12    "Service Board" means the Board of the Commuter Rail 13Division of the Authority, the Board of the Suburban Bus 14Division of the Authority, and the Board of the Chicago 15Transit Authority established pursuant to the Chicago Transit 16Authority Act. 17    "Traffic capacity" means the designed capacity for traffic 18volume on a roadway facility. 19    "Traffic volume" means the number of persons moved through 20a corridor in a given period of time, across all travel modes. 21    "Transit signal priority" or "TSP" means the operational 22strategies and associated equipment, software, communications, 23and timing changes that improve the movement of public   HB4759- 2 -LRB104 19857 LNS 33307 b1transportation vehicles through signalized intersections.2    "Vehicle traffic capacity" means the designed capacity for 3vehicle traffic volume on a roadway facility. 4    "Vehicle traffic volume" means the number of motor 5vehicles traveling through a corridor in a given period.  6    Section 10. Establishment of the Committee. 7    (a) The Committee on Efficient Arterial Signal 8Infrastructure shall be established to advise the Department 9on strategies and initiatives to improve public transit 10service efficiency and reliability through roadway and 11signalization infrastructure improvements in a metropolitan 12region. 13    (b) The Committee shall make recommendations to increase 14the traffic capacity of roadway corridors within a 15metropolitan region, and that maintain or reduce the vehicle 16traffic capacity of those same corridors. 17    (c) As needed, the Committee shall coordinate with: 18        (1) the Blue-Ribbon Commission on Transportation 19    Infrastructure Funding and Policy; and 20        (2) the Interagency Coordinating Committee on Transit 21    Innovation, Integration, and Reform. 22    (d) The Committee shall meet at the call of the Chair, but 23not less than quarterly.24    The Committee shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act 25and the Freedom of Information Act.   HB4759- 3 -LRB104 19857 LNS 33307 b1    (e) The Department shall provide administrative support to 2the Committee. 3    Subject to appropriation and applicable procurement law, 4the Department may procure consulting assistance necessary to 5support the work of the Committee.6    (f) The Committee shall, at a minimum:7        (1) inventory and review existing traffic 8    signalization and central signal system infrastructure, 9    including compatibility among traffic signal equipment, 10    transit vehicles, and communications systems used by 11    public transportation providers in the metropolitan 12    region; 13        (2) develop strategies and recommendations to expand 14    transit signal priority and related transit-supportive 15    signal operations that increase traffic capacity and 16    improve transit travel-time reliability; 17        (3) recommend practices that support coordinated or 18    regionalized signal operations across jurisdictions and 19    transit operators, including data standards, 20    interoperability, and procurement best practices; 21        (4) develop objectives and recommended approaches for 22    providing technical assistance to units of local 23    government and transit operators for implementation of the 24    Committee's recommendations; 25        (5) estimate costs associated with procuring, 26    installing, operating, maintaining, and replacing signal   HB4759- 4 -LRB104 19857 LNS 33307 b1    priority infrastructure; 2        (6) estimate economic impacts associated with the 3    Committee's recommendations; 4        (7) estimate, where practicable, anticipated changes 5    in traffic volume and vehicle traffic volume associated 6    with the Committee's recommendations; 7        (8) identify opportunities to align or modify existing 8    and future Department funding programs and grant criteria 9    to support implementation, including criteria that reward 10    measurable improvements in traffic volume capacity; and 11        (9) submit recommendations for inclusion in the 12    Department's Public Transportation Plan, including any 13    recommended legislative or administrative changes needed 14    to implement best practices. 15            (A) The Committee shall publish a report with its 16        recommendations no later than 2 years after the 17        effective date of this Act. 18            (B) The Department shall post the report on its 19        website and transmit the report to the Governor and 20        the General Assembly. 21            (C) The Department shall incorporate any 22        recommendations included in the Committee's report in 23        the Department's next annual update of the Public 24        Transportation Plan. 25    (g) The Committee shall include the following members, 26appointed by the Secretary:  HB4759- 5 -LRB104 19857 LNS 33307 b1        (1) the Secretary or the Secretary's designee, who 2    shall serve as Chair; 3        (2) the Department's Region 1 Engineer or the 4    Engineer's designee; 5        (3) one staff member from the Department's Office of 6    Finance and Administration whose duties involve transit 7    grant administration or procurement; 8        (4) one staff member from the Department's Office of 9    Highways Project Implementation whose duties involve the 10    operations of local roads and streets; 11        (5) one staff member from the Office of Intermodal 12    Project Implementation whose duties involve transit 13    oversight; 14        (6) one staff member from the Office of Highway 15    Planning and Implementation whose duties include planning 16    in urban areas; 17        (7) one staff member representing the Northern 18    Illinois Transit Authority, as designated by the Chairman 19    of the Board of the Authority; 20        (8) one staff member representing the Chicago Transit 21    Authority, as designated by the Chairman of the Board of 22    the Chicago Transit Authority; 23        (9) one staff member representing the Suburban Bus 24    Division, as designated by the Chairman of the Suburban 25    Bus Board; 26        (10) one staff member representing the Chicago   HB4759- 6 -LRB104 19857 LNS 33307 b1    Metropolitan Agency for Planning; 2        (11) one staff member representing the Chicago 3    Department of Transportation, as designated by the Mayor 4    of Chicago; 5        (12) one staff member representing the Cook County 6    Department of Transportation and Highways, as designated 7    by the President of the Cook County Board of 8    Commissioners; 9        (13) one staff member representing the DuPage County 10    Division of Transportation, as designated by the Chairman 11    of the DuPage County Board; 12        (14) at the discretion of their respective County 13    Board Chairmans, one or more staff members representing 14    the Counties of Lake, Will, Kane, or McHenry that are 15    involved in planning, design, construction, maintenance, 16    and permitted use of roadways; and 17        (15) additional members as determined necessary by the 18    Secretary to ensure subject-matter expertise, community 19    representation, and geographic diversity. 20    Members shall serve without compensation. To the extent 21permitted by law and subject to appropriation, members may be 22reimbursed for necessary expenses associated with Committee 23service in accordance with applicable State travel rules. 24    The Chair may dissolve the Committee following the 25publication of the report.   HB4759- 7 -LRB104 19857 LNS 33307 b1    Section 15. Implementation authorization. 2    (a) Under the supervision of the Secretary, and for the 3benefit of a Service Board, the Authority may, by ordinance, 4establish and administer a transit signal priority program for 5public transportation vehicles in the metropolitan region. 6    The Authority may provide funding, procure equipment and 7services, and enter into intergovernmental agreements or other 8agreements necessary to plan, design, implement, operate, and 9maintain transit signal priority and signal priority 10infrastructure on public ways in the metropolitan region. 11    Nothing in this Section authorizes the installation, 12modification, operation, or maintenance of traffic control 13devices except in accordance with the Illinois Vehicle Code, 14the Illinois Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, and 15applicable federal requirements. 16    Transit signal priority implemented under this Section 17shall not impair emergency vehicle signal preemption, railroad 18signal preemption, or other safety-critical signal operations 19required by law or engineering standards. 20    For highways and streets under the jurisdiction of the 21Department, implementation under this Section is subject to 22the Department's approval and permitting requirements. 23    For highways and streets under the jurisdiction of a unit 24of local government, implementation under this Section shall 25be carried out pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement with 26the unit of local government having maintenance jurisdiction.   HB4759- 8 -LRB104 19857 LNS 33307 b1A unit of local government shall not unreasonably withhold 2agreement for transit signal priority improvements that are 3consistent with this subsection and that are funded in whole 4or in part by the Authority or the Department. 5    (b) For any Department-funded project in the metropolitan 6region that includes the installation, modernization, 7replacement, or retiming of traffic signals on a roadway that 8is served by fixed-route bus service operated by, or under 9contract with, a Service Board, the Department shall evaluate 10the feasibility and cost-effectiveness of including design 11features and equipment accommodations that support transit 12signal priority implementation.13    Where the Department determines transit signal priority is 14feasible, cost-effective, and consistent with applicable 15safety and traffic control standards, the Department shall 16incorporate transit signal priority accommodations into the 17project design. 18    Nothing in this subsection requires the Department to fund 19or install onboard equipment on public transportation 20vehicles, or to implement transit signal priority where doing 21so would conflict with applicable safety or traffic control 22standards. 23    Section 20. Repeal. 24    (a) This Act is repealed on the date that is 10 years after 25its effective date.   HB4759- 9 -LRB104 19857 LNS 33307 b1    (b) The repeal of Section 2.06.3 of the Regional 2Transportation Authority Act does not affect: 3        (1) any ordinance adopted, agreement executed, or 4    procurement commenced under that Section before the repeal 5    of the Act; or 6        (2) the continued operation or maintenance of signal 7    priority infrastructure installed before the repeal of the 8    Act, to the extent authorized under other applicable law. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.